Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 197.2. It shall be unlawful to employ workers in any
industry or occupation within the State of Oklahoma under conditions
of labor detrimental to their health or morals and it shall be
unlawful to employ workers in any industry within the State of
Oklahoma at wages which are not adequate for their maintenance.
Except as otherwise provided in the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act, no
employer within the State of Oklahoma shall pay any employee a wage
of less than the current federal minimum wage Fifteen Dollars
($15.00) per hour for all hours worked. An employer may not apply

Req. No. 14399 Page 1

tips or gratuities bestowed upon employees as credit toward payment
of the minimum hourly wage required by this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14399 TKR 01/14/26



















Req. No. 14399 Page 2